Tennessee, session 114, HB2406.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-212(n), is amended by deleting
the period (.) at the end of the first sentence and adding the following:
; provided, however, that the exemption shall be a maximum of four hundred (400) acres
for any nonprofit entity that owns or operates a premier type tourist resort under § 57-4-
102(30)(LLLLLL).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2406
010564
- 1 -